Spring 2015/CS581/usarufa.lexc
! Trevor Cargile
! CS581 - Homework 3 part 1
! 813542789

Multichar_Symbols +1s +2s +3sMasc +2d

LEXICON Root
		Verb;

LEXICON Verb
talk:te		Ending;
eat:naa		Ending;
do:o		Ending;
give:ame	Ending;
hear:itaa	Ending;
hit:ikamo	Ending;

LEXICON Ending
+1s:%^une	#;
+2s:%^ne	#;
+3sMasc:%^iye	#;
+2d:%^kao	#;
